languages/apertium-gla/apertium-gla.gla.dix
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>abcdefghilmnoprstuàèìòùáéówxyzABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUÀÈÌÒÙÁÉÓWXYZ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relativiser"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Coordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="preverb" c="Preverbal"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"   c="The verb 'to be'"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>

    <sdef n="tv"      c="Transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"      c="Intransitive"/>

    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparative"/>

    <sdef n="pers"    c="Personal"/>
    <sdef n="emph"    c="Emphatic"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexive"/>

    <sdef n="subst"   c="Verbal noun"/>
    <sdef n="pres"    c="Non-past"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Indefinite I"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Indefinite II"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>

    <sdef n="dep"     c="Dependent form"/>
    <sdef n="indep"   c="Independent form"/>

    <sdef n="m"       c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculine / feminine"/>

    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>

    <sdef n="nom"     c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"     c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="dat"     c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="voc"     c="Vocative"/>

    <sdef n="p1"      c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="Third person"/>

    <sdef n="len"     c="Lenition"/>

    <sdef n="cm"      c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->
  
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e><p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.!:\?]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Miscellaneous -->

    <pardef n="ma__preverb">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ag__preverb">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ag</l><r>ag<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>a'</l><r>ag<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>ag</l><r>ag<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/an__preverb">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l><r>an<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>am</l><r>an<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><j/>an</l><r>an<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/nan__preverb">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nan</l><r>nan<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nam</l><r>nan<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><j/>nan</l><r>nan<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gun__preverb">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gun</l><r>gun<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gum</l><r>gun<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><j/>gun</l><r>gun<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/cha__preverb">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>cha</l><r>cha<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>chan</l><r>cha<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><j/>cha</l><r>cha<s n="preverb"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__rel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="rel"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->
 
    <pardef n="/agus__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l>agus</l><r>agus<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>agus<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>'s</l><r>agus<s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ach__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nuair__cnjsub" c="Type III">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Prepositions -->

    <pardef n="far__pr">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="airson__pr"> <!-- In case we want a diff. for complex prep. -->
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a/ig__pr">
      <e><p><l>ig</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>gam</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gad</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ige</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ice</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gainn</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>gaibh</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ca</l><r>ig<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/air__pr">
      <e><p><l>air</l><r>air<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orm</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ort</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>air</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oirre</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oirnn</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oirbh</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orra</l><r>air<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/gu__pr">
      <e><p><l>gu</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>


      <e><p><l>thugam</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>mi<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thugad</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>tu<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thuige</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>e<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thuice</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>i<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thugainn</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>sinn<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thugaibh</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>sibh<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>thuca</l><r>gu<s n="pr"/><j/>iad<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ag"><i></i><par n="/ag__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="ma"><i>ma</i><par n="ma__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="nach"><i>nach</i><par n="ma__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><i></i><par n="/an__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="nan"><i></i><par n="/nan__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="chan"><i></i><par n="/cha__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="gun"><i></i><par n="/gun__preverb"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>far</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="cò"><i>cò</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="airson"><i>airson</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="nuair"><i>nuair</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="mar"><i>mar</i><par n="a__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="agus"><i></i><par n="/agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="ach__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i>no</i><par n="ach__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="nuair"><i>nuair</i><par n="nuair__cnjsub"/></e>
    <e lm="a"><i>a</i><par n="far__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="far"><i>far</i><par n="far__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="mar"><i>mar</i><par n="far__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gun"><i>gun</i><par n="far__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="cho"><i>cho</i><par n="far__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="aig"><i>a</i><par n="a/ig__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="air"><i></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="gu"><i></i><par n="/gu__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="barrachd air"><i>barrachd<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="faisg air"><i>faisg<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="goirid air"><i>goirid<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="seachad air"><i>seachad<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="thairis air"><i>thairis<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="fairis air"><i>fairis<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="timcheall air"><i>timcheall<b/></i><par n="/air__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a dh'ionnsaidh"><i>a<b/>dh'ionnsaidh</i><par n="airson__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="air son"><i>air<b/>son</i><par n="airson__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="air son" r="LR"><p><l>airson</l><r>air<b/>son</r></p><par n="airson__pr"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="guionet"/></e>
    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
